Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-370
Insurance, bond, certificate, and permit requirements; enforcement; duties.

Enforcement of sections 75-307 and 75-309 shall be carried out by the carrier enforcement division of the Nebraska State Patrol or the Nebraska State Patrol pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission to enforce such sections. Any violation of such sections by any regulated motor carrier, motor carrier, or private carrier shall be referred to the commission for disposition under section 75-156, and the commission may take any other action provided by section 75-133.

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 32;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 80;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 49;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 63;

Laws 2006, LB 1069, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB358, § 15.